Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3510
Direct access, defined.

Direct access shall mean having the custodial authority to handle and control the actual documents or automated or computerized documentary record which constitutes the criminal history database.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 10.